Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-294] Special purpose revenue bonds
exempt from taxation. Special purpose revenue bonds and the income derived
from the bonds issued pursuant to this part shall be exempt from all state,
county, and municipal taxation, except for inheritance, transfer, and estate
taxes. [L 2006, c 102, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next